Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
328J

SMOKING

Section

328J-1 Definitions

328J-2 Prohibition in facilities owned by the
State or

the counties

328J-3 Prohibition in enclosed or partially
enclosed places

open to the public

328J-4 Prohibition in enclosed or partially
enclosed places

of employment

328J-5 Prohibition in sports arenas, outdoor
arenas,

stadiums, and amphitheaters

328J-6 Presumptively reasonable distance

328J-7 Exceptions

328J-8 Declaration of establishment as nonsmoking

328J-9 Signs

328J-10 Nonretaliation and nonwaiver of rights

328J-11 Compliance and administration

328J-12 Penalties

328J-13 Public education

328J-14 Other applicable laws

328J-15 County ordinances

328J-16 Cigarette sales from vending machines and
by

lunch wagons prohibited

328J-17 Distribution of sample cigarette or
tobacco

products, cigarette or tobacco promotional

materials, and coupons redeemable for
cigarette

or tobacco products or promotional
materials

328J-18 Placement of cigarettes and tobacco
products

Cross References

Prohibition on smoking in and around public housing, see §356D-6.5.

Reduced ignition propensity cigarettes, see chapter 132C.

Smoking or use of tobacco products prohibited within state
park system, see §184-4.5.

Tobacco and electronic smoking devices prohibited; minors,
see §709-908.

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next